Hawaii statutes.
[§672E-10] Release. If the parties
resolve the claim in whole or in part, the claimant shall be barred from
bringing an action for the resolved claims. [L 2004, c 119, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next